en: Roasted northern pike, Baked northern pike
fr: Brochet rôti, Brochet cuit au four

en: Fish on skewer, Fish skewers
fr: Brochettes de poisson

en: Frozen fish skewers
fr: Brochettes de poisson surgelées

en: Fish preparations, Preparations made from fish
bg: Готови рибени ястия
ca: Preparacions de peix
de: Fischzubereitungen
es: Preparaciones de pescado
fi: käsitelty kala
fr: Préparations de poisson
hr: Riblji pripravci
it: Preparazioni a base di pesce
nl: Visproducten
pt: Preparados de peixe
ro: Preparate din pește

en: Tuna preparations
fr: Préparations de thon

en: Salmon preparations
fr: Préparations de saumon

en: Salmon tartares
fr: Tartares de saumon

en: Anchoïades, Anchoiades
xx: Anchoïades, Anchoiades
fr: Anchoïades, Anchoiades

en: Surimi, crab stick, crab sticks, mock crab, seafood sticks, seafood stick, fish stick, fish sticks, imitation crab, seafood extender, seafood extenders
bg: Рулца от раци
de: Surimi, Krebsfleischimitat
es: Surimi
fi: Surimi, Rapupuikot
fr: Surimi, surimis
hr: Surimi
it: Surimi
ja: すり身
nl: Surimi
pl: Surimi, Paluszki krabowe
ru: Сурими, крабовые палочки, крабовое мясо

en: Surimi on sticks, Surimi on sticks with crab flavour
fr: Bâtonnets de surimi, Bâtonnets de surimi saveur crabe, bâtonnet de surimi

en: Surimi in slices, Surimi in slices with crab flavour
fr: Surimi en tranches, Surimi en tranches saveur crabe

en: Grated surimi, Grated surimi with crab flavour
fr: Miettes de surimi, miette de surimi, Surimi râpé saveur crabe

en: Surimi filled with cheese
fr: Surimi fourré au fromage

en: Frozen surimi
fr: Surimi surgelé, surimis surgelés

en: Fried fish croquette, Fried fish fritter, Fried fish nuggets
fr: Croquettes de poisson frites, beignet de poisson frit, nuggets de poisson frit
hr: Kroketi od pržene ribe
nl: Gefrituurde visnuggets

en: Meat fritters
fr: Beignets de viande, Beignets à la viande

en: Poultry fritters
fr: Beignets de volaille

en: Fish fritters
fr: Beignets de poissons

en: Breaded fish
de: Panierte Fische, Panierter Fisch
es: Pescado empanado
fi: leivitetty kala
fr: Poissons panés, Poisson pané
hr: Panirana riba
it: Pesce impanato
nl: Gepaneerde vis
sv: Panerad fisk

en: Frozen breaded fish, Fish breaded frozen
fr: Poissons panés surgelés, Poisson pané surgelé